Utah statutes.
77-28c-201.   Authority of governor to join compact.

The governor of Utah is authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states joining the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision as provided in Section 77-28c-103.



Enacted by Chapter 45, 2001 General Session

